Massachusetts, session 194th, S1852.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3 of Chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after the words "supervision of prisoners;", in line 272, the
following words:-
employees of the Executive Office of Public Safety and Security working as State Police
Dispatchers or State 911 Dispatchers in groups SPD 1, 2, and 3 who have been employed in a
such a capacity for 10 years or more;
of 1